Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-3,100
Applicability of act.

The Assault of an Unborn Child Act does not apply to:

(1) Any act or conduct that is committed or engaged in by the mother of the unborn child;

(2) Any medical procedure performed with the consent of the mother; or

(3) Dispensing a drug or device in accordance with law or administering a drug or device prescribed in accordance with law.

Laws 2006, LB 57, § 7.